Hawaii statutes.
[§235-110.46] Attractions and educational
facilities tax credit; Ko Olina Resort and Marina; Makaha Resort. (a)
There shall be allowed to each qualified taxpayer subject to the taxes imposed
by this chapter or chapter 237, 237D, 238, 239, 241, or 431, a tax credit
[that] may be claimed for taxable years beginning after December 31, 2004, for
qualified costs in the development of facilities for attractions and
educational purposes at Ko Olina Resort and Marina and at Makaha Resort. The
tax credit shall be deductible from the taxpayer's net income tax liability, if
any, imposed by this chapter and, at the election of the taxpayer, from the tax
liability imposed by chapters 237, 237D, 238, 239, 241, and 431.

(b) The tax credit earned shall be equal to the
qualified costs incurred from June 1, 2003, through May 31, 2009, up to a
maximum of $75,000,000 of credits in the aggregate for all qualified taxpayers
for all years; provided that notwithstanding the amount of tax credits earned
in any year, a maximum of $7,500,000 of tax credits in the aggregate for all
qualified taxpayers may be used in any one taxable year. The credits over
$7,500,000 shall be used as provided in subsection (d). In the case of a
partnership, limited liability company, S corporation, estate, trust, or
association of apartment owners, the tax credit allowable is for qualified
costs incurred by the entity. The costs upon which the tax credit is computed
shall be determined at the entity level.

(c) To qualify for the tax credit, a taxpayer
shall:

(1) Have expended qualified costs on and be
developing a world-class aquarium and marine science and mammal research
facility at Ko Olina Resort and Marina; and

(2) Dedicate one-half of the net operating income of
the world-class aquarium to the State, beginning on the first day of the
seventeenth year following the year in which the attractions and educational
facilities credit was first taken; or

(3) Acquire or own the Makaha Resort, and lease or
sell a portion of the Makaha Resort for use as training and educational
facilities for a period of not less than six years to a taxpayer meeting the
requirements of subsection (c)(1).

(d) If the tax credit under this section
exceeds $7,500,000 in the aggregate for all qualified taxpayers for any taxable
year or exceeds the taxpayer's tax liability under this chapter or chapters
237, 237D, 238, 239, 241, and 431 for any year for which the credit is taken,
the excess of the tax credit may be used as a credit against the taxpayer's tax
liability for the taxes set forth in this section in subsequent years until
exhausted; provided that the taxpayer may continue to claim the credit provided
in this section if the qualified costs are incurred before June 1, 2009,
subject to the monetary ceilings in subsection (b).

(e) Every claim, including amended claims, for
a tax credit under this section shall be filed on or before the end of the
twelfth month following the close of the taxable year for which the credit may
be claimed. Failure to comply with the foregoing provision shall constitute a
waiver of the right to claim the credit.

(f) If, at any time during the six-year period
in which tax credits are earned under this section, the costs incurred no
longer meet the definition of qualified costs, the credits claimed under this
section shall be recaptured. The recapture shall be equal to one hundred per
cent of the total tax credits claimed under this section for the preceding
taxable year; provided that the amount of the credits recaptured shall apply only
to those costs that no longer meet the definition of qualified costs. The
amount of the recaptured tax credits determined under this subsection shall be
added to the taxpayer's tax liability for the taxable year in which the
recapture occurs under this subsection.

(g) If any credit is claimed under this
section, then no taxpayer shall claim a credit under any chapter identified in
this section for the same qualified costs for which a credit is claimed under
this section.

(h) The director of taxation shall prepare any
forms that may be necessary to claim a credit under this section. The director
may also require the taxpayer to furnish information to ascertain the validity
of the claims for credits made under this section and may adopt rules necessary
to effectuate the purposes of this section pursuant to chapter 91.

Every qualified taxpayer, no later than March
31 of each year in which qualified costs were expended in the previous taxable
year, shall submit a written, certified statement to the director of business,
economic development, and tourism, in the form specified by the director of
business, economic development, and tourism, identifying:

(1) Qualified costs, if any, expended in the previous
taxable year;

(2) The amount of tax credits claimed pursuant to
this section, if any, in the previous taxable year; and

(3) The tax liability under this chapter and chapters
237, 237D, 238, 239, 241, and 431 against which the tax credits are claimed.

Any other law to the contrary notwithstanding, a statement
submitted under this subsection shall be a public document.

(i) The department of business, economic
development, and tourism shall maintain records of the names of taxpayers
eligible for the credits and the total amount of qualified costs incurred from
June 1, 2003, through May 31, 2009. The department of business, economic
development, and tourism shall verify all qualified costs and, upon each
determination, shall issue a certificate to the taxpayer certifying:

(1) The amount of the qualified costs; and

(2) The amount of tax credit that the taxpayer is
allowed to use for the taxable year.

The department of business, economic
development, and tourism shall certify no more than $7,500,000 in credits in
the aggregate for all taxpayers for each taxable year; provided that the
department may verify qualified costs of no more than $75,000,000 from June 1,
2003, through May 31, 2009. The taxpayer shall file the certificate with the
taxpayer's return with the department of taxation.

(j) As used in this section:

"Ko Olina Resort and Marina" means
the six hundred forty-two acres reclassified to urban district by Decision and
Order entered on September 12, 1985, in Docket A83-562, by the land use
commission.

"Makaha Resort" means the three
hundred thirty-two acre property identified as tax map keys (1) 8-04-002
parcels 51, 52, 53, 54, 55, and 67 and (1) 8-04-029-142.

"Qualified costs" means any costs for
plans, design, and construction, costs for equipment that is permanently
affixed to a building or structure, and acquisition of facilities for
educational purposes, up to a total of $75,000,000 in the aggregate, incurred
after May 31, 2003, and before June 1, 2009, at either or both of:

(1) Ko Olina Resort and Marina for the development of
facilities for attractions and educational purposes, and for infrastructure
within the Ko Olina Resort and Marina that is directly related to those
facilities, including a world-class aquarium, marine science and mammal
research facilities, international sports training complex, a travel industry
management intern campus, infrastructure for the transfer of ocean waters to
the aquarium or marine mammal facilities, or both, seawater air conditioning,
and other educational facilities developed or operated in cooperation with the
University of Hawaii or other educational institutions; or

(2) Makaha Resort for the development of a training
and educational facility within a working resort and hotel;

provided that "qualified costs" shall not
include land acquisition costs.

"Qualified taxpayer" means a person
who fulfills the requirements of subsection (c). [L 2003, c 100, §3]

Note

Section applies to qualified costs incurred after May 31,
2003. L 2003, c 100, §6.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next